North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Voting Agreements.

§ 55A-7-30.
Voting agreements.

Two or more members may provide for the manner in which their voting rights will be exercised by signing an agreement for that purpose. The agreement may be valid for a period of up to 10 years. All or some of the parties to the agreement may extend it for more than 10 years from the date the first party signs the extension agreement, but the extension agreement binds only those parties signing it. For charitable or religious corporations, such agreements shall have a reasonable purpose not inconsistent with the corporation’s charitable or religious purposes.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, a voting agreement created under this section may be specifically enforceable.

The provisions of a voting agreement created under this section will bind a transferee of a membership covered by the agreement only if the transferee acquires the membership with knowledge of the provisions.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

§§ 55A-7-31 through 55A-7-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.